Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB73.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 302 of the act of August 26, 1971 (P.L.351, No.91), known as the State Lottery Law, is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 302. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:1234567891011121314151617181920 Section 316. Disclosure of certain prizewinner identities. (a) General rule.--Notwithstanding any other provision of law and except as otherwise provided in this section, the name, address and any other personal information of a prizewinner awarded a lottery prize of $100,000 or more shall remain confidential and may not be considered a public record.(b) Exception.--The city, township or borough of residence, county of residence and prize amount payable to a prizewinner shall remain a public record.(c) Waiver of confidentiality.--A prizewinner under subsection (a) may voluntarily waive confidentiality provided in subsection (a) in a form and manner prescribed by the secretary.(d) Regulations.--The department may promulgate rules and regulations to implement this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0073PN0030 - 2 - 123456789101112131415